Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2483.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 17 TLSB 5013SV (1) 91 ak/ko S.F. 2483 DIVISION I 1 DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS ââ FY 2026-2027 2 Section 1. DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS. There is 3 appropriated from the general fund of the state to the 4 department of veterans affairs for the fiscal year beginning 5 July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, the following amounts, 6 or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the purposes 7 designated: 8 1. DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS ADMINISTRATION 9 For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 10 purposes: 11 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,369,205 12 2. IOWA VETERANS HOME 13 For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 14 purposes: 15 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 8,145,736 16 a. The Iowa veterans home billings involving the department 17 of health and human services shall be submitted to the 18 department on at least a monthly basis. 19 b. The Iowa veterans home expenditure report shall be 20 submitted monthly to the general assembly. 21 3. HOME OWNERSHIP ASSISTANCE PROGRAM 22 For transfer to the Iowa finance authority for the 23 continuation of the home ownership assistance program for 24 persons who are or were eligible members of the armed forces 25 of the United States or eligible service members pursuant to 26 section 16.54: 27 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,200,000 28 DIVISION II 29 AGING AND DISABILITY SERVICES ââ FY 2026-2027 30 Sec. 2. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES ââ AGING 31 AND DISABILITY SERVICES. There is appropriated from the 32 general fund of the state to the department of health and human 33 services for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending 34 June 30, 2027, the following amount, or so much thereof as is 35 -1- LSB 5013SV (1) 91 ak/ko 1/ 37 S.F. 2483 necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: 1 For aging programs for the department of health and human 2 services and area agencies on aging to provide citizens of 3 Iowa who are 60 years of age and older with case management; 4 for Iowaâs aging and disabilities resource centers; for the 5 return to community program; for the purposes of chapter 231E; 6 to administer the prevention of elder abuse, neglect, and 7 exploitation program pursuant to section 231.56A, in accordance 8 with the requirements of the federal Older Americans Act of 9 1965, 42 U.S.C. Â§3001 et seq., as amended; for the operation 10 of the dependent adult abuse services program pursuant to 11 chapter 235B; for matching funding for programs to enable 12 persons with severe physical or mental disabilities to function 13 more independently; for costs associated with centers for 14 independent living; and for other services which may include 15 but are not limited to adult day care, respite care, chore, 16 information and assistance, and material aid; for information 17 and options counseling for persons with disabilities; and 18 for salaries, support, administration, maintenance, and 19 miscellaneous purposes: 20 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 19,379,531 21 1. Moneys appropriated in this section may be used to 22 supplement federal moneys received under federal regulations. 23 To receive moneys appropriated in this section, a local area 24 agency on aging shall match the moneys with moneys from other 25 sources according to rules adopted by the department. Moneys 26 appropriated in this section may be used for services not 27 specifically enumerated in this section only if approved by the 28 department as part of an area agency on agingâs area plan. 29 2. Of the moneys appropriated in this section, $949,282 30 is allocated to be used for the comprehensive family support 31 program created in section 231.80 as enacted under this Act. 32 3. Of the moneys appropriated in this section, $33,632 33 is allocated to be used to build community capacity through 34 the coordination and provision of training opportunities in 35 -2- LSB 5013SV (1) 91 ak/ko 2/ 37 S.F. 2483 accordance with the consent decree of Conner v. Branstad, No. 1 4-86-CV-30871 (S.D. Iowa, July 15, 1994). 2 DIVISION III 3 BEHAVIORAL HEALTH ââ FY 2026-2027 4 Sec. 3. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES ââ 5 BEHAVIORAL HEALTH. There is appropriated from the general fund 6 of the state to the department of health and human services for 7 the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 8 2027, the following amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, 9 to be used for the purposes designated: 10 For behavioral health prevention, education, early 11 intervention, treatment, recovery support, and crisis 12 services in order to support statewide access to treatment for 13 behavioral health conditions; stabilization and mitigation of 14 behavioral health crises; and recovery for individuals and 15 families impacted by behavioral health conditions. Activities 16 shall align with accepted best practice guidance standards for 17 behavioral health including those published by the centers for 18 disease control and prevention of the United States department 19 of health and human services, and the substance abuse and 20 mental health services administration of the United States 21 department of health and human services, for health promotion; 22 universal, selective, and indicated prevention; treatment; and 23 recovery services and supports; and shall include a 24-hour 24 helpline, public information resources, professional training, 25 youth prevention, program evaluation, and efforts at the state 26 and local levels: 27 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 23,127,121 28 1. Of the moneys appropriated in this section, $300,000 29 is allocated to support the work of the childrenâs behavioral 30 health system including evidence-based behavioral health 31 prevention, treatment, and recovery services and supports for 32 children and their families. 33 2. Of the moneys appropriated in this section, $950,000 34 is allocated for an integrated substance use disorder managed 35 -3- LSB 5013SV (1) 91 ak/ko 3/ 37 S.F. 2483 care system. The department shall maintain the level of mental 1 health and substance use disorder treatment services provided 2 by the managed care contractors, and shall take the steps 3 necessary to continue the federal waivers as needed to maintain 4 the level of services. 5 Sec. 4. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES ââ SPORTS 6 WAGERING RECEIPTS FUND. There is appropriated from the 7 sports wagering receipts fund created in section 8.57I, to the 8 department of health and human services for the fiscal year 9 beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, the following 10 amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for 11 behavioral health prevention, education, early intervention, 12 treatment, recovery support, and crisis services in order to 13 support statewide access to treatment for behavioral health 14 conditions; stabilization and mitigation of behavioral health 15 crises; and recovery for individuals and families impacted by 16 behavioral health conditions: 17 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,750,000 18 DIVISION IV 19 PUBLIC HEALTH ââ FY 2026-2027 20 Sec. 5. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES ââ PUBLIC 21 HEALTH. There is appropriated from the general fund of the 22 state to the department of health and human services for the 23 fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, 24 the following amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be 25 used for the purposes designated: 26 For programs that support health promotion, protect the 27 health and safety of the public, conduct disease surveillance 28 and investigation to reduce the incidence of morbidity and 29 mortality, serve individuals with chronic conditions including 30 but not limited to cancer, support the Iowa donor registry as 31 specified in section 142C.18, and strengthen the health care 32 delivery system and workforce to improve health outcomes for 33 all Iowans: 34 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 21,833,369 35 -4- LSB 5013SV (1) 91 ak/ko 4/ 37 S.F. 2483 1. Of the moneys appropriated in this section, the following 1 amounts are allocated to the department of health and human 2 services to be used as follows to support the goals of 3 increased access, health system integration, and engagement: 4 a. $600,000 for distribution to a nonprofit organization 5 that established the first statewide drug donation repository 6 for continuation of the pharmaceutical infrastructure for 7 safety net providers established as described in 2007 Iowa 8 Acts, chapter 218, section 108, and for the prescription drug 9 donation repository program established in chapter 135M. 10 Moneys under this paragraph shall be distributed in their 11 entirety on July 1, 2026, for the purpose specified. 12 b. $374,000 for distribution to free clinics, as defined in 13 section 135.24, and a nonprofit organization that facilitates 14 the initiation, operation, and collaboration of free clinics 15 for necessary infrastructure, statewide coordination, provider 16 recruitment, service delivery, and provision of assistance to 17 patients in securing a medical home inclusive of oral health 18 care. Of the moneys allocated, $40,000 shall be used to lower 19 fees associated with using an electronic prescribing system. 20 Moneys under this paragraph shall be distributed in their 21 entirety on July 1, 2026, for the purpose specified. 22 c. $25,000 for distribution to an organization that raises 23 awareness about issues related to rural health clinics for 24 necessary infrastructure and service delivery transformation. 25 Moneys under this paragraph shall be distributed in their 26 entirety on July 1, 2026, for the purpose specified. 27 2. Of the moneys appropriated in this section, $400,000 28 is allocated for rural psychiatric residencies for residents 29 selected on or before June 30, 2026. 30 3. Of the moneys appropriated in this section, $20,000 is 31 allocated to make radon test kits available, free of charge, 32 to homeowners and renters in the state. The department shall 33 provide a link on the departmentâs internet site for homeowners 34 and renters in the state to order radon test kits. 35 -5- LSB 5013SV (1) 91 ak/ko 5/ 37 S.F. 2483 4. Of the moneys appropriated in this section, $2,500,000 1 is allocated for Medicaid graduate medical education efforts 2 and consistent with the purpose of the departmentâs request for 3 approval to the centers of Medicare and Medicaid services of 4 the United States department of health and human services for 5 a Medicaid supplemental enhanced payment for the purposes of 6 maximizing federal funding opportunities for graduate medical 7 education as described in 2025 Iowa Acts, chapter 120, section 8 13. 9 5. The university of Iowa hospitals and clinics under 10 the control of the state board of regents shall not receive 11 indirect costs from the moneys appropriated in this section. 12 The university of Iowa hospitals and clinics billings to the 13 department shall be, at a minimum, on a quarterly basis. 14 DIVISION V 15 COMMUNITY ACCESS AND ELIGIBILITY ââ CHILD SUPPORT SERVICES ââ 16 TANF ââ FY 2026-2027 17 Sec. 6. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES ââ COMMUNITY 18 ACCESS AND ELIGIBILITY. There is appropriated from the 19 general fund of the state to the department of health and human 20 services for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending 21 June 30, 2027, the following amount, or so much thereof as is 22 necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: 23 To be used for salaries, support, maintenance, and 24 miscellaneous purposes and for family investment program (FIP) 25 assistance in accordance with chapter 239B, and for other costs 26 associated with providing needs-based benefits or assistance 27 including but not limited to maternal and child health, oral 28 health, obesity prevention, the promoting independence and 29 self-sufficiency through employment, job opportunities and the 30 basic skills (PROMISE JOBS) program, supplemental nutrition 31 assistance program (SNAP) employment and training, the FIP 32 diversion program, family planning, rent reimbursement, 33 and eligibility determinations for medical assistance, food 34 assistance, and the childrenâs health insurance program: 35 -6- LSB 5013SV (1) 91 ak/ko 6/ 37 S.F. 2483 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 76,312,642 1 1. Of the child support collections assigned under FIP, 2 the federal share of the child support collections shall be 3 credited to the child support services appropriation made in 4 this division of this Act. Of the remainder of the child 5 support collections assigned under FIP, a portion shall be 6 credited to community access and eligibility, and the remaining 7 moneys may be used to increase recoveries, to sustain cash flow 8 in the collection services center refund account as provided in 9 section 252B.13A, or for technology needs. If child support 10 collections assigned under FIP are greater than estimated or 11 are otherwise determined not to be required for maintenance of 12 efforts, the state share of either amount is appropriated to 13 the department for child support services as described in this 14 division of this Act, or may be transferred to or retained in 15 the collection services center refund account. 16 2. Of the moneys appropriated in this section, $3,075,000 is 17 allocated for continuation of the departmentâs initiative to 18 provide for adequate developmental surveillance and screening 19 during a childâs first five years. The moneys shall first be 20 used to fully fund the current participating counties to ensure 21 that those counties are fully operational, with the remaining 22 moneys to be used for expanding participation to additional 23 counties. Full implementation and expansion shall include 24 enhancing the scope of the initiative through collaboration 25 with child health specialty clinics to promote the use of 26 developmental surveillance and screening to support healthy 27 child development through early identification and response to 28 biomedical and social determinants of healthy development by 29 providing practitioner consultation and continuous improvement 30 through training and education, particularly for children 31 with behavioral conditions and needs. The department shall 32 also collaborate with the Medicaid program and child health 33 specialty clinics to assist in coordinating the activities 34 of the first five initiative into the establishment of 35 -7- LSB 5013SV (1) 91 ak/ko 7/ 37 S.F. 2483 patient-centered medical homes developed to improve health 1 quality and population health while reducing health care costs. 2 To the maximum extent possible, moneys allocated in this 3 subsection shall be utilized as matching moneys for Medicaid 4 program reimbursement. 5 3. Of the moneys appropriated in this section, $1,145,102 is 6 allocated to the Iowa commission on volunteer service created 7 in section 15H.2 for programs and grants. 8 4. The university of Iowa hospitals and clinics under 9 the control of the state board of regents shall not receive 10 indirect costs from the moneys appropriated in this section. 11 The university of Iowa hospitals and clinics billings to the 12 department shall be, at a minimum, on a quarterly basis. 13 Sec. 7. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES ââ CHILD 14 SUPPORT SERVICES. There is appropriated from the general fund 15 of the state to the department of health and human services for 16 the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 17 2027, the following amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, 18 to be used for the purposes designated: 19 For child support services, including salaries, support, 20 maintenance, and miscellaneous purposes: 21 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 15,644,114 22 1. Federal access and visitation grant moneys shall be used 23 for services designed to increase compliance with the child 24 access provisions of court orders, including but not limited to 25 neutral visitation sites and mediation services. 26 2. Moneys appropriated in this section may be used 27 throughout the fiscal year in the manner necessary for 28 cash flow management. For cash flow management under this 29 subsection, the department may temporarily draw more than the 30 amount appropriated provided the amount appropriated is not 31 exceeded at the close of the fiscal year. 32 Sec. 8. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES ââ 33 TEMPORARY ASSISTANCE FOR NEEDY FAMILIES BLOCK GRANT. There is 34 appropriated from the special fund created in section 8.41 to 35 -8- LSB 5013SV (1) 91 ak/ko 8/ 37 S.F. 2483 the department of health and human services for the fiscal year 1 beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, from moneys 2 received under the federal temporary assistance for needy 3 families (TANF) block grant pursuant to the federal Personal 4 Responsibility and Work Opportunity Reconciliation Act of 1996, 5 Pub. L. No. 104-193, and successor legislation, including TANF 6 block grant moneys received in any prior fiscal year that 7 were deposited in the special fund and remain unencumbered 8 or unobligated on June 30, 2026, the following amounts, or 9 so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the purposes 10 designated: 11 1. For community access and eligibility: 12 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 12,566,312 13 2. For community access and eligibility to provide 14 pregnancy prevention grants on the condition that family 15 planning services are funded: 16 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,913,203 17 Pregnancy prevention grants shall be awarded to programs 18 in existence on or before July 1, 2026, if the programs have 19 demonstrated positive outcomes. Grants shall be awarded 20 to pregnancy prevention programs developed after July 1, 21 2026, if the programs are based on existing models that have 22 demonstrated positive outcomes. Grants must comply with the 23 requirements provided in 1997 Iowa Acts, chapter 208, section 24 14, subsections 1 and 2, including the requirement that a 25 program awarded a grant must emphasize sexual abstinence. 26 Priority in awarding grants shall be given to programs 27 that serve areas of the state which demonstrate the highest 28 percentage of unplanned pregnancies of females of childbearing 29 age within the geographic area to be served by the grant. 30 3. To meet one of the four purposes of TANF as specified 31 in 45 C.F.R. Â§260.20, including by modernizing the program 32 to promote economic mobility and self-sufficiency, ensuring 33 that families are able to overcome benefit cliffs, encouraging 34 healthy families, and streamlining service delivery to reduce 35 -9- LSB 5013SV (1) 91 ak/ko 9/ 37 S.F. 2483 duplication: 1 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 25,000,000 2 4. For early intervention and supports for child abuse 3 prevention and the family development and self-sufficiency 4 (FaDSS) grant program in accordance with section 216A.107: 5 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,013,980 6 5. For accountability, compliance, program integrity, 7 technology needs, and other resources necessary to meet 8 federal and state reporting, tracking, and case management 9 requirements, and other departmental needs: 10 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,533,647 11 6. For state child care assistance: 12 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 42,281,826 13 7. For child protective services: 14 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 67,249,100 15 a. Of the moneys appropriated in this subsection, 16 $1,658,000 shall be allocated for child protection centers 17 located in Iowa pursuant to the child protection center grant 18 program under section 135.118. The grant amounts under the 19 program shall be equalized so that each center receives a 20 uniform base amount of $245,000, and the remaining moneys 21 are awarded through a funding formula based upon the volume 22 of children served by a center. To increase access to child 23 protection center services for children in rural areas, the 24 funding formula for awarding the remaining moneys shall provide 25 for awarding an enhanced amount to eligible grantees to develop 26 and maintain satellite centers in underserved regions of the 27 state. 28 b. Of the moneys appropriated in this subsection, up to 29 $227,000 shall be used for the public purpose of continuing a 30 grant to a nonprofit human services organization that provides 31 services to individuals and families in multiple locations in 32 southwest Iowa and Nebraska, for support of a project providing 33 immediate, sensitive support and forensic interviews, medical 34 exams, needs assessments, and referrals for victims of child 35 -10- LSB 5013SV (1) 91 ak/ko 10/ 37 S.F. 2483 abuse and their nonoffending family members. 1 DIVISION VI 2 MEDICAL ASSISTANCE PROGRAM ââ STATE SUPPLEMENTARY ASSISTANCE ââ 3 HEALTHY AND WELL KIDS IN IOWA PROGRAM AND OTHER HEALTH-RELATED 4 PROGRAMS ââ FY 2026-2027 5 Sec. 9. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES ââ MEDICAL 6 ASSISTANCE PROGRAM, STATE SUPPLEMENTARY ASSISTANCE, AND HEALTHY 7 AND WELL KIDS IN IOWA PROGRAM. There is appropriated from the 8 general fund of the state to the department of health and human 9 services for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending 10 June 30, 2027, the following amount, or so much thereof as is 11 necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: 12 For medical assistance program reimbursement and associated 13 costs as specifically provided in the reimbursement 14 methodologies in effect on June 30, 2026, except as otherwise 15 expressly authorized by law, consistent with options under 16 federal law and regulations, and contingent upon receipt of 17 approval from the office of the governor of reimbursement for 18 each abortion performed under the medical assistance program; 19 for the state supplementary assistance program; for the health 20 insurance premium payment program; and for maintenance of 21 the healthy and well kids in Iowa (Hawki) program pursuant 22 to chapter 514I, including supplemental dental services, 23 for receipt of federal financial participation under Tit. 24 XXI of the federal Social Security Act, which creates the 25 childrenâs health insurance program; and for other specified 26 health-related programs: 27 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,992,550,706 28 1. Of the moneys appropriated in this section, $3,383,880 29 shall be used for program administration, outreach, and 30 enrollment activities of the state family planning services 31 program pursuant to section 217.41B, and of this amount, the 32 department may use up to $200,000 for administrative expenses. 33 2. Iowans support reducing the number of abortions 34 performed in this state. Moneys appropriated under this 35 -11- LSB 5013SV (1) 91 ak/ko 11/ 37 S.F. 2483 section shall not be used for abortions, unless otherwise 1 authorized under this section. 2 3. The provisions of this section relating to abortions also 3 apply to the Iowa health and wellness plan established pursuant 4 to chapter 249N. 5 Sec. 10. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES ââ HEALTH 6 PROGRAM OPERATIONS. There is appropriated from the general 7 fund of the state to the department of health and human 8 services for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending 9 June 30, 2027, the following amount, or so much thereof as is 10 necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: 11 For health program operations and the autism support program 12 under section 225D.2: 13 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 39,672,433 14 1. The department of inspections, appeals, and licensing 15 shall provide all state matching moneys for survey and 16 certification activities performed by the department of 17 inspections, appeals, and licensing. The department of health 18 and human services shall be solely responsible for distributing 19 the federal matching moneys for such activities. 20 2. Of the moneys appropriated in this section, a sufficient 21 amount is allocated for the administration of the health 22 insurance premium payment program, including salaries, support, 23 maintenance, and miscellaneous purposes. 24 3. Of the moneys appropriated in this section, $750,000 is 25 allocated for a nonprofit organization that provides access 26 to emergency poison information and treatment. Pursuant to 27 the directive under 2014 Iowa Acts, chapter 1140, section 28 102, the federal matching moneys available to the nonprofit 29 organization from the department under the federal Childrenâs 30 Health Insurance Program Reauthorization Act of 2009 shall be 31 subject to the federal administrative cap rule of 10 percent 32 applicable to moneys provided under Tit. XXI of the federal 33 Social Security Act, and shall be included in the departmentâs 34 calculations of the cap. 35 -12- LSB 5013SV (1) 91 ak/ko 12/ 37 S.F. 2483 4. Unless otherwise provided by law, if a contract for 1 services provided under this section initially entered into 2 during the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending 3 June 30, 2027, provides for an annual increase of the cost of 4 services provided under the contract, the annual increase shall 5 not exceed the amount by which the consumer price index for 6 all urban consumers increased during the immediately preceding 7 calendar year. This subsection does not affect a contract 8 entered into on or before June 30, 2026, that is for a term of 9 more than one year. 10 Sec. 11. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES ââ 11 PHARMACEUTICAL SETTLEMENT ACCOUNT. Notwithstanding section 12 249A.33, subsection 2, there is appropriated from the 13 pharmaceutical settlement account created in section 249A.33 14 any moneys remaining in the account for the fiscal year 15 beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, to the 16 department of health and human services to supplement the 17 appropriation made in this Act from the general fund of the 18 state for the medical assistance program for the same fiscal 19 year. 20 Sec. 12. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES ââ 21 QUALITY ASSURANCE TRUST FUND. Notwithstanding section 249L.4, 22 subsection 2, there is appropriated from the quality assurance 23 trust fund created in section 249L.4 any moneys remaining in 24 the fund for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending 25 June 30, 2027, to the department of health and human services 26 to supplement the appropriation made in this Act from the 27 general fund of the state for the medical assistance program 28 for the same fiscal year. 29 Sec. 13. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES ââ HOSPITAL 30 HEALTH CARE ACCESS TRUST FUND. Notwithstanding section 249M.4, 31 subsection 2, there is appropriated from the hospital health 32 care access trust fund created in section 249M.4 any moneys 33 remaining in the fund for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 34 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, to the department of health and 35 -13- LSB 5013SV (1) 91 ak/ko 13/ 37 S.F. 2483 human services to supplement the appropriation made in this Act 1 from the general fund of the state for the medical assistance 2 program for the same fiscal year. 3 Sec. 14. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES ââ 4 BEHAVIORAL HEALTH FUND. Notwithstanding section 225A.7, 5 subsection 2, and subject to the availability of moneys, there 6 is appropriated from the behavioral health fund established in 7 section 225A.7, to the department of health and human services 8 for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 9 2027, the following amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, 10 for the purposes designated: 11 To supplement the appropriation made in this Act from the 12 general fund of the state to the department of health and human 13 services for medical assistance for the fiscal year beginning 14 July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027: 15 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 7,053,449 16 Sec. 15. REIMBURSEMENT RATES. 17 1. Reimbursement for medical assistance, state 18 supplementary assistance, and social service providers and 19 services reimbursed under the purview of the department of 20 health and human services shall remain at the reimbursement 21 rate in effect on June 30, 2026, or shall be determined 22 pursuant to the reimbursement methodology in effect on June 30, 23 2026, with the exception of the following: 24 a. If reimbursement is otherwise negotiated by contract or 25 pursuant to an updated fee schedule. 26 b. As otherwise provided in this section. 27 2. a. (1) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 28 contrary, for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and 29 ending June 30, 2027, the department of health and human 30 services shall base case-mix nursing facility rates on the 31 case-mix nursing facility rates annually in effect on June 30, 32 2026. 33 (2) The department of health and human services shall 34 calculate each nursing facilityâs case-mix index for the period 35 -14- LSB 5013SV (1) 91 ak/ko 14/ 37 S.F. 2483 beginning July 1, 2025. 1 b. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, $1,167,867 2 shall be used to increase to the extent possible reimbursement 3 rates for ambulatory surgical centers compared to rates in 4 effect on June 30, 2026. 5 DIVISION VII 6 FAMILY WELL-BEING AND PROTECTION ââ FY 2026-2027 7 Sec. 16. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES ââ STATE 8 CHILD CARE ASSISTANCE. There is appropriated from the general 9 fund of the state to the department of health and human 10 services for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending 11 June 30, 2027, the following amount, or so much thereof as is 12 necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: 13 For state child care assistance in accordance with sections 14 237A.13 and 237A.14: 15 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 31,983,000 16 1. If the appropriation made for purposes of the state child 17 care assistance program for the fiscal year is determined to 18 be insufficient, it is the intent of the general assembly to 19 appropriate sufficient moneys for the fiscal year to avoid 20 application of waiting list requirements. 21 2. A portion of the state match for the federal child care 22 and development block grant shall be provided as necessary to 23 meet federal matching moneys requirements through the state 24 general fund appropriation made for child development grants 25 and other programs for at-risk children in section 279.51. 26 Sec. 17. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES ââ EARLY 27 INTERVENTION AND SUPPORTS. There is appropriated from the 28 general fund of the state to the department of health and human 29 services for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending 30 June 30, 2027, the following amount, or so much thereof as is 31 necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: 32 For promotion of optimum health status for children and 33 adolescents from birth through 21 years of age, and for 34 families: 35 -15- LSB 5013SV (1) 91 ak/ko 15/ 37 S.F. 2483 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 35,695,203 1 1. Of the moneys appropriated in this section, not more than 2 $734,000 is allocated for the healthy opportunities for parents 3 to experience success (HOPES) â healthy families Iowa (HFI) 4 program established pursuant to section 135.106. 5 2. Of the moneys appropriated in this section, $4,313,854 6 is allocated for the FaDSS grant program, and not more 7 than 5 percent of the allocated moneys shall be used for 8 administration of the grant program. 9 3. Of the moneys appropriated in this section, $29,256,799 10 shall be deposited in the early childhood Iowa fund created in 11 section 256I.11. 12 Sec. 18. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES ââ CHILD 13 PROTECTIVE SERVICES. There is appropriated from the general 14 fund of the state to the department of health and human 15 services for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending 16 June 30, 2027, the following amount, or so much thereof as is 17 necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: 18 For child, family, and adoption services, and for salaries, 19 support, maintenance, and miscellaneous purposes: 20 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $164,052,467 21 1. Based on client need, a portion of the moneys 22 appropriated in this section may be used to provide other 23 resources required to support family preservation, emergency 24 client need, or family reunification efforts. 25 2. Of the moneys appropriated in this section, a sufficient 26 amount is allocated for foster family care, group foster care 27 maintenance and services, shelter care, child welfare emergency 28 services, qualified residential treatment programs, supervised 29 apartment living contracts, and for medical assistance program 30 reimbursement and associated costs. 31 3. Federal moneys received by the state during the fiscal 32 year beginning July 1, 2026, as the result of the expenditure 33 of state moneys appropriated during a previous state fiscal 34 year for a service or activity funded under this section, 35 -16- LSB 5013SV (1) 91 ak/ko 16/ 37 S.F. 2483 are appropriated to the department to be used as additional 1 moneys for services and purposes provided under this section. 2 Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys appropriated under this 3 subsection that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the close 4 of the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain available 5 for the purposes designated until the close of the succeeding 6 fiscal year. 7 4. a. Of the moneys appropriated in this section, $748,000 8 is allocated for the payment of the expenses of court-ordered 9 services provided to children who are under the supervision 10 of the department, which expenses are a charge upon the state 11 pursuant to section 232.141, subsection 4. 12 b. Notwithstanding chapter 232 or any other provision of 13 law to the contrary, a district or juvenile court shall not 14 order any service which is a charge upon the state pursuant to 15 section 232.141, subsection 4, if the moneys allocated under 16 paragraph âaâ for court-ordered services are insufficient to 17 pay for the service. 18 5. Of the moneys appropriated in this section, $4,359,500 19 is allocated for the preparation for adult living program 20 established pursuant to section 234.46. 21 6. Of the moneys appropriated in this section, a portion may 22 be used for family-centered services for purposes of complying 23 with the federal Family First Prevention Services Act of 2018, 24 Pub. L. No. 115-123, and successor legislation. 25 7. a. Of the moneys appropriated in this section, 26 $39,823,955 is allocated for adoption subsidy payments and 27 related costs. 28 b. Any moneys remaining after the allocation under 29 paragraph âaâ is designated and allocated as state savings 30 resulting from implementation of the federal Fostering 31 Connections to Success and Increasing Adoptions Act of 2008, 32 Pub. L. No. 110-351, and successor legislation, as determined 33 in accordance with 42 U.S.C. Â§673(a)(8), and shall be used for 34 post-adoption services and for other purposes allowed under 35 -17- LSB 5013SV (1) 91 ak/ko 17/ 37 S.F. 2483 those federal Acts and regulations, and Tit. IV-B or Tit. IV-E 1 of the federal Social Security Act. 2 8. Of the moneys appropriated in this section, a sufficient 3 amount is allocated to support training needs for child welfare 4 providers and to address disproportionality within the child 5 welfare system. 6 9. If a separate funding source is available that reduces 7 the need for state moneys within an allocation under this 8 section, the allocated state moneys may be redistributed to 9 other allocations under this section for the same fiscal year. 10 DIVISION VIII 11 STATE-OPERATED SPECIALTY CARE ââ FY 2026-2027 12 Sec. 19. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES ââ 13 STATE-OPERATED SPECIALTY CARE. There is appropriated from the 14 general fund of the state to the department of health and human 15 services for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending 16 June 30, 2027, the following amount, or so much thereof as is 17 necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: 18 For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 19 purposes at institutions under the jurisdiction of the 20 department of health and human services: 21 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,225,768 22 1. The department shall utilize the moneys appropriated in 23 this section as necessary to maximize bed capacity and to most 24 effectively meet the needs of the individuals served. 25 2. Of the moneys appropriated in this section, the following 26 amounts are allocated to each institution as follows: 27 a. For the state mental health institute at Cherokee: 28 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 19,878,962 29 b. For the state mental health institute at Independence: 30 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 23,760,205 31 c. For the civil commitment unit for sexual offenders at 32 Cherokee: 33 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 23,272,111 34 d. For the state resource center at Woodward: 35 -18- LSB 5013SV (1) 91 ak/ko 18/ 37 S.F. 2483 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 12,567,092 1 e. For the state training school at Eldora: 2 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 19,805,171 3 f. For outstanding obligations related to workersâ 4 compensation, the sick leave insurance program, unemployment, 5 and other costs related to the closure of the state resource 6 center at Glenwood: 7 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 942,227 8 DIVISION IX 9 ADMINISTRATION AND COMPLIANCE ââ FY 2026-2027 10 Sec. 20. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES ââ 11 ACCOUNTABILITY, COMPLIANCE, AND PROGRAM INTEGRITY. There 12 is appropriated from the general fund of the state to the 13 department of health and human services for the fiscal year 14 beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, the following 15 amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the 16 purposes designated: 17 For accountability, compliance, and program integrity, 18 including salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 19 purposes: 20 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 23,087,834 21 1. Of the moneys appropriated in this section, $2,602,312 22 is allocated for foster care review and the court appointed 23 special advocate program, including for salaries, support, 24 maintenance, and miscellaneous purposes. 25 2. Of the moneys appropriated in this section, $1,148,959 26 is allocated for the office of long-term care ombudsman 27 for salaries, support, administration, maintenance, and 28 miscellaneous purposes. 29 DIVISION X 30 TRANSFERS, CASH FLOW, AND NONREVERSIONS ââ FY 2026-2027 31 Sec. 21. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES ââ 32 TRANSFERS AND CASH FLOW. 33 1. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, 34 the department of health and human services may transfer moneys 35 -19- LSB 5013SV (1) 91 ak/ko 19/ 37 S.F. 2483 appropriated in this Act to support continuing alignment 1 efforts, to maximize federal support in accordance with the 2 departmentâs federal costs allocation plan, and to secure 3 resources necessary to implement and administer the services 4 for which moneys are appropriated. The department shall report 5 any transfers made pursuant to this subsection to the general 6 assembly. 7 2. If, due to ongoing cost management efforts, 8 appropriations under this Act for the Medicaid program 9 exceed the associated costs for the Medicaid program for the 10 fiscal year, the department may transfer any savings to the 11 appropriations made in this Act for health program operations, 12 or for accountability, compliance, and program integrity, 13 to defray the costs associated with ongoing cost management 14 efforts. 15 3. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, 16 the department may transfer moneys appropriated under this Act 17 for child protective services to pay the nonfederal share costs 18 of services reimbursed under the medical assistance program, 19 state child care assistance program, or family investment 20 program which are provided to children who would otherwise 21 receive services paid by the appropriation for child protective 22 services. 23 4. The department may transfer moneys from the temporary 24 assistance for needy families block grant to the federal social 25 services block grant appropriation, and to the child care and 26 development block grant appropriation, in accordance with 27 federal law. 28 5. To the extent the department determines that moneys 29 appropriated under this Act, or allocated for a specific 30 purpose under this Act, will remain unencumbered or unobligated 31 at the close of the fiscal year, such unencumbered or 32 unobligated moneys may be used in the same fiscal year for any 33 other purpose for which the appropriated moneys may be used, or 34 for any other allocation within the same appropriation. 35 -20- LSB 5013SV (1) 91 ak/ko 20/ 37 S.F. 2483 Sec. 22. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES ââ 1 NONREVERSIONS. 2 1. Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys appropriated under 3 this Act from the general fund of the state and the temporary 4 assistance for needy families block grant to the department of 5 health and human services for the fiscal year beginning July 6 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, for the purposes of the 7 FaDSS grant program, that remain unencumbered or unobligated at 8 the close of the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain 9 available for expenditure for the purposes designated until the 10 close of the succeeding fiscal year. 11 2. Notwithstanding section 8.33, of the moneys appropriated 12 under this Act from the general fund of the state, the quality 13 assurance trust fund, and the hospital health care access trust 14 fund to the department of health and human services for the 15 fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, 16 for the purposes of the medical assistance program, the amount 17 in excess of actual expenditures for the medical assistance 18 program that remains unencumbered or unobligated at the close 19 of the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain available 20 for expenditure for the medical assistance program until the 21 close of the succeeding fiscal year. 22 3. Notwithstanding section 8.33, and notwithstanding the 23 nonreversion amount limitation specified for state resource 24 centers in section 222.92, subsection 4, moneys appropriated 25 under this Act from the general fund of the state to the 26 department of health and human services for the fiscal year 27 beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, for the 28 purposes of state-operated specialty care, that remain 29 unencumbered or unobligated at the close of the fiscal year 30 shall not revert but shall remain available for expenditure for 31 the purposes designated for subsequent fiscal years. 32 4. Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys appropriated in 33 this Act from the general fund of the state to the department 34 of health and human services for the fiscal year beginning July 35 -21- LSB 5013SV (1) 91 ak/ko 21/ 37 S.F. 2483 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, for the Iowa commission 1 on volunteer service for programs and grants, that remain 2 unencumbered or unobligated at the close of the fiscal year 3 shall not revert but shall remain available for expenditure for 4 the purposes designated for subsequent fiscal years. 5 5. Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys appropriated under 6 this Act from the general fund of the state to the department 7 of health and human services for the fiscal year beginning 8 July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, and allocated for 9 rural psychiatric residencies, that remain unencumbered or 10 unobligated at the close of the fiscal year shall not revert 11 but shall remain available for expenditure for the purposes 12 designated until the close of the succeeding fiscal year. 13 6. Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys appropriated 14 under this Act from the general fund of the state to the 15 department of health and human services for the fiscal 16 year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, and 17 allocated for adoption subsidy payments and related costs, or 18 for post-adoption services and allowable related purposes, 19 that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the close of the 20 fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain available for 21 expenditure for the purposes designated until the close of the 22 succeeding fiscal year. 23 7. Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys appropriated under 24 this Act from the general fund of the state to the department 25 of health and human services for the fiscal year beginning July 26 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, and allocated for child 27 protective services, that remain unencumbered or unobligated at 28 the close of the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain 29 available for expenditure for the purposes designated until the 30 close of the succeeding fiscal year. 31 DIVISION XI 32 REPORT ON NONREVERSION OF MONEYS 33 Sec. 23. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES ââ REPORT 34 ON NONREVERSION OF MONEYS. The department of health and 35 -22- LSB 5013SV (1) 91 ak/ko 22/ 37 S.F. 2483 human services shall report the expenditure of any moneys for 1 which nonreversion authorization was provided for the fiscal 2 year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, to the 3 general assembly on a quarterly basis beginning October 1, 4 2026. 5 DIVISION XII 6 EMERGENCY RULES 7 Sec. 24. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES ââ 8 EMERGENCY RULES. 9 1. If necessary to comply with federal requirements, 10 including time frames, the department of health and human 11 services shall adopt administrative rules under section 17A.4, 12 subsection 3, and section 17A.5, subsection 2, paragraph âbâ, 13 to implement the applicable provisions of this Act. The rules 14 shall be effective immediately upon filing unless a later date 15 is specified in the rules. Any rules adopted in accordance 16 with this section shall also be published as a notice of 17 intended action as provided in section 17A.4. 18 2. If the department of health and human services adopts 19 emergency rules in accordance with this section, or as 20 otherwise directed or authorized by state law, and the rules 21 will result in an increase in expenditures beyond the amount 22 anticipated in the budget for the fiscal year, or if the 23 expenditures were not addressed in the budget for the fiscal 24 year, the department shall notify the general assembly and the 25 department of management concerning the rules and the increase 26 in expenditures. The notification shall be provided at least 27 thirty calendar days prior to the date notice of the rules 28 is submitted to the administrative rules coordinator and the 29 administrative code editor. 30 DIVISION XIII 31 MORE OPTIONS FOR MATERNAL SUPPORT PROGRAM APPROPRIATION 32 NONREVERSION 33 Sec. 25. 2025 Iowa Acts, chapter 169, section 27 , is amended 34 by adding the following new subsection: 35 -23- LSB 5013SV (1) 91 ak/ko 23/ 37 S.F. 2483 NEW SUBSECTION . 8. Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys 1 appropriated from the general fund of the state to the 2 department of health and human services for the fiscal year 3 beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, for the more 4 options for maternal support program created in section 217.41C 5 that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the close of the 6 fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain available for 7 expenditure for the purposes designated until the close of the 8 succeeding fiscal year. 9 Sec. 26. EFFECTIVE DATE. This division of this Act, being 10 deemed of immediate importance, takes effect upon enactment. 11 Sec. 27. RETROACTIVE APPLICABILITY. This division of this 12 Act applies retroactively to July 1, 2025. 13 DIVISION XIV 14 CHILD WELFARE AND JUVENILE JUSTICE DECATEGORIZATION 15 Sec. 28. Section 235.7, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 16 to read as follows: 17 2. Membership. The department may authorize the governance 18 boards of decategorization of child welfare and juvenile 19 justice funding projects established under section 232.188 to 20 appoint the transition committee membership and may utilize 21 the boundaries of decategorization projects to establish 22 the service areas for transition committees. The committee 23 A committeeâs membership may include but is not limited to 24 department staff involved with foster care, child welfare, 25 and adult services, juvenile court services staff, staff 26 involved with county general assistance or emergency relief 27 under chapter 251 or 252 , school district and area education 28 agency staff involved with special education, and a childâs 29 court appointed special advocate, guardian ad litem, service 30 providers, and other persons knowledgeable about the child. 31 Sec. 29. Section 237A.1, subsection 2, paragraph j, 32 subparagraph (2), Code 2026, is amended by striking the 33 subparagraph. 34 Sec. 30. Section 249A.26, subsection 5, Code 2026, is 35 -24- LSB 5013SV (1) 91 ak/ko 24/ 37 S.F. 2483 amended by striking the subsection. 1 Sec. 31. Section 256I.4, subsection 6, Code 2026, is amended 2 by striking the subsection. 3 Sec. 32. REPEAL. Section 232.188, Code 2026, is repealed. 4 Sec. 33. DECATEGORIZATION CARRYOVER FUNDING. 5 1. For purposes of this section, unless the context 6 otherwise requires: 7 a. âCarryover fundingâ means unobligated or unencumbered 8 moneys described in section 232.188, subsection 5, paragraph 9 âbâ, Code 2026, at the close of the fiscal year beginning July 10 1, 2025. 11 b. âDecategorization projectâ means the same as defined in 12 section 232.188, Code 2026. 13 c. âFunding poolâ means the same as defined in section 14 232.188, Code 2026. 15 d. âGovernance boardâ means the same as defined in section 16 232.188, Code 2026. 17 2. Carryover funding that remains in a funding pool at the 18 close of the fiscal year beginning Ju1y 1, 2025, which has been 19 encumbered or obligated by the governance board for a multiyear 20 service decategorization project for that fiscal year, shall 21 remain available for expenditure to ensure continuation of 22 such service or activity until the close of the fiscal year 23 beginning July 1, 2028, or until the close of the fiscal year 24 in which the service or activity is completed, whichever is 25 earlier. 26 3. Carryover funding that remains in a funding pool at the 27 end of the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, which remains 28 unencumbered or unobligated by the governance board for a 29 multiyear service decategorization project for that fiscal 30 year, shall be appropriated to the department of health and 31 human services and juvenile court services proportionately 32 based on the percentage of moneys appropriated to each entity 33 by the general assembly for decategorization projects. 34 Sec. 34. EFFECTIVE DATE. The section of this division of 35 -25- LSB 5013SV (1) 91 ak/ko 25/ 37 S.F. 2483 this Act related to decategorization carryover funding, being 1 deemed of immediate importance, takes effect upon enactment. 2 Sec. 35. RETROACTIVE APPLICABILITY. The section of this 3 division of this Act related to decategorization carryover 4 funding applies retroactively to July 1, 2025. 5 DIVISION XV 6 COMMITMENT OR HOSPITALIZATION OF CERTAIN PERSONS WITH SUBSTANCE 7 USE DISORDERS OR MENTAL ILLNESS 8 Sec. 36. Section 125.81, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended 9 to read as follows: 10 1. a. If a person filing an application requests that a 11 respondent be taken into immediate custody, and the court upon 12 reviewing the application and accompanying documentation, finds 13 probable cause to believe that the respondent is a person with 14 a substance use disorder who is likely to injure the person or 15 other persons if allowed to remain at liberty, the court may 16 enter a written order directing that the respondent be taken 17 into immediate custody by the sheriff, and be detained until 18 the commitment hearing, which shall be held no more than five 19 days after the date of the order, except that if the fifth 20 day after the date of the order is a Saturday, Sunday, or a 21 holiday, the hearing may be held on the next business day. The 22 court may order the respondent detained for the period of time 23 until the hearing is held, and no longer except as provided in 24 section 125.88 , in accordance with subsection 2 , paragraph âaâ , 25 if possible, and if not, then in accordance with subsection 2 , 26 paragraph âbâ , or, only if neither of these alternatives is 27 available in accordance with subsection 2 , paragraph âcâ . 28 b. The county in which a respondent is taken into immediate 29 custody by the sheriff pursuant to paragraph âaâ shall 30 compensate the sheriff, as determined by the county board of 31 supervisors of that county and consistent with section 331.655, 32 subsection 1, paragraph âlâ , for conveyance of the respondent 33 to a detention location. 34 Sec. 37. Section 229.2, subsection 1, paragraph b, 35 -26- LSB 5013SV (1) 91 ak/ko 26/ 37 S.F. 2483 subparagraph (3), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 1 (3) As soon as is practicable after the filing of a 2 petition for juvenile court approval of the admission of the 3 minor, the juvenile court shall determine whether the minor 4 has an attorney to represent the minor in the hospitalization 5 proceeding, and if not, the court shall assign to appoint the 6 minor an attorney pursuant to section 815.10 . If the minor is 7 financially unable to pay for an attorney, the attorney shall 8 be compensated by an administrative services organization at an 9 hourly rate to be established by the administrative services 10 organization in substantially the same manner as provided in 11 section 815.7 . 12 Sec. 38. Section 229.8, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended 13 to read as follows: 14 1. Determine whether the respondent has an attorney 15 who is able and willing to represent the respondent in the 16 hospitalization proceeding, and if not, whether the respondent 17 is financially able to employ an attorney and capable of 18 meaningfully assisting in selecting one. In accordance with 19 those determinations, the court shall if necessary allow 20 the respondent to select, or pursuant to section 815.10 21 shall assign to appoint the respondent, an attorney. If the 22 respondent is financially unable to pay an attorney, the 23 attorney shall be compensated by an administrative services 24 organization at an hourly rate to be established by the 25 administrative services organization in substantially the same 26 manner as provided in section 815.7 . 27 Sec. 39. Section 229.10, subsection 1, paragraph a, Code 28 2026, is amended to read as follows: 29 a. An examination of the respondent shall be conducted by 30 one or more licensed physicians or mental health professionals, 31 as required by the courtâs order, within a reasonable time. 32 If the respondent is detained pursuant to section 229.11, 33 subsection 1 , paragraph âbâ âaâ , subparagraph (2) , the 34 examination shall be conducted within twenty-four hours. 35 -27- LSB 5013SV (1) 91 ak/ko 27/ 37 S.F. 2483 If the respondent is detained pursuant to section 229.11, 1 subsection 1 , paragraph âaâ or âcâ , subparagraph (1) or (3) , the 2 examination shall be conducted within forty-eight hours. If 3 the respondent so desires, the respondent shall be entitled to 4 a separate examination by a licensed physician or mental health 5 professional of the respondentâs own choice. The reasonable 6 cost of the examinations shall, if the respondent lacks 7 sufficient funds to pay the cost, be paid by an administrative 8 services organization upon order of the court. 9 Sec. 40. Section 229.11, subsections 1 and 3, Code 2026, are 10 amended to read as follows: 11 1. a. If the applicant requests that the respondent be 12 taken into immediate custody and the judge, upon reviewing the 13 application and accompanying documentation, finds probable 14 cause to believe that the respondent has a serious mental 15 impairment and is likely to injure the respondent or other 16 persons if allowed to remain at liberty, the judge may enter 17 a written order directing that the respondent be taken into 18 immediate custody by the sheriff or the sheriffâs deputy 19 and be detained until the hospitalization hearing. The 20 hospitalization hearing shall be held no more than five days 21 after the date of the order, except that if the fifth day after 22 the date of the order is a Saturday, Sunday, or a holiday, the 23 hearing may be held on the next succeeding business day. If 24 the expenses of a respondent are payable in whole or in part 25 by an administrative services organization, for a placement 26 in accordance with paragraph âaâ , the judge shall give notice 27 of the placement to an administrative services organization, 28 and for a placement in accordance with paragraph âbâ or âcâ , 29 the judge shall order the placement in a hospital or facility 30 designated by an administrative services organization. The 31 judge may order the respondent detained for the period of time 32 until the hearing is held, and no longer, in accordance with 33 paragraph âaâ subparagraph (1) , if possible, and if not then 34 in accordance with paragraph âbâ subparagraph (2) , or, only if 35 -28- LSB 5013SV (1) 91 ak/ko 28/ 37 S.F. 2483 neither of these alternatives is available, in accordance with 1 paragraph âcâ subparagraph (3) . Detention may be in any of the 2 following: 3 a. (1) In the custody of a relative, friend, or other 4 suitable person who is willing to accept responsibility for 5 supervision of the respondent, and the respondent may be placed 6 under such reasonable restrictions as the judge may order 7 including but not limited to restrictions on or a prohibition 8 of any expenditure, encumbrance, or disposition of the 9 respondentâs funds or property. 10 b. (2) In a suitable hospital the chief medical officer of 11 which shall be informed of the reasons why immediate custody 12 has been ordered and may provide treatment which is necessary 13 to preserve the respondentâs life, or to appropriately control 14 behavior by the respondent which is likely to result in 15 physical injury to the respondent or to others if allowed 16 to continue, but may not otherwise provide treatment to the 17 respondent without the respondentâs consent. 18 c. (3) In the nearest facility in the community which is 19 licensed to care for persons with mental illness or substance 20 use disorder, provided that detention in a jail or other 21 facility intended for confinement of those accused or convicted 22 of crime shall not be ordered. 23 b. The county in which a respondent is taken into immediate 24 custody by the sheriff pursuant to paragraph âaâ shall 25 compensate the sheriff, as determined by the county board of 26 supervisors of that county and consistent with section 331.655, 27 subsection 1, paragraph âlâ , for conveyance of the respondent 28 to a detention location. 29 3. If a respondent is detained pursuant to subsection 1 , 30 paragraph âbâ or âcâ âaâ , subparagraph (2) or (3) , the sheriff 31 or the sheriffâs deputy that took the respondent into immediate 32 custody may inform the hospital or facility that an arrest 33 warrant has been issued for or charges are pending against the 34 respondent and may request the hospital or facility to notify 35 -29- LSB 5013SV (1) 91 ak/ko 29/ 37 S.F. 2483 the sheriff or the sheriffâs deputy about the discharge of the 1 respondent prior to discharge. 2 Sec. 41. Section 229.22, subsection 2, paragraph a, 3 subparagraph (1), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 4 (1) In the circumstances described in subsection 1 , any 5 peace officer who has reasonable grounds to believe that 6 a person is mentally ill, and because of that illness is 7 likely to physically injure the personâs self or others if 8 not immediately detained, may without a warrant take or cause 9 that person to be taken to the nearest available facility or 10 hospital as defined described in section 229.11, subsection 1 , 11 paragraphs âbâ paragraph âaâ , subparagraphs (2) and âcâ (3) . A 12 person believed mentally ill, and likely to injure the personâs 13 self or others if not immediately detained, may be delivered to 14 a facility or hospital by someone other than a peace officer. 15 Sec. 42. Section 815.9, subsection 1, unnumbered paragraph 16 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 17 For purposes of this chapter , chapters 13B , 125, 229, 229A , 18 232 , 665 , 812 , 814 , and 822 , and section 811.1A , and the rules 19 of criminal procedure, a person is indigent if the person is 20 entitled to an attorney appointed by the court as follows: 21 DIVISION XVI 22 CHILD ABUSE PREVENTION 23 Sec. 43. Section 144.13A, subsection 5, paragraph a, Code 24 2026, is amended to read as follows: 25 a. Ten dollars of each registration fee is appropriated and 26 shall be used for primary and secondary child abuse prevention 27 programs pursuant to section 235A.1 , and ten dollars of each 28 registration fee is appropriated and shall be used for the 29 congenital and inherited disorders central registry established 30 pursuant to section 136A.6 . Notwithstanding section 8.33 , 31 moneys appropriated in this paragraph that remain unencumbered 32 or unobligated at the close of the fiscal year shall not revert 33 but shall remain available for expenditure for the purposes 34 designated until the close of the succeeding fiscal year, and 35 -30- LSB 5013SV (1) 91 ak/ko 30/ 37 S.F. 2483 shall not be transferred, used, obligated, appropriated, or 1 otherwise encumbered except as provided in this paragraph. 2 Sec. 44. Section 422.12K, Code 2026, is amended to read as 3 follows: 4 422.12K Income tax checkoff for child abuse prevention 5 program fund . 6 1. A person who files an individual or a joint income tax 7 return with the department of revenue under section 422.13 may 8 designate one dollar or more to be paid to the child abuse 9 prevention program early childhood and family services system 10 fund created in section 235A.2 234A.6, to be used for the 11 purpose of child abuse prevention . If the refund due on the 12 return or the payment remitted with the return is insufficient 13 to pay the additional amount designated by the taxpayer to 14 the child abuse prevention program early childhood and family 15 services system fund, the amount designated shall be reduced to 16 the remaining amount remitted with the return. The designation 17 of a contribution to the child abuse prevention program early 18 childhood and family services system fund under this section 19 is irrevocable. 20 2. The director of revenue shall draft the income tax form 21 to allow the designation of contributions to the child abuse 22 prevention program early childhood and family services system 23 fund on the tax return. The department of revenue, on or 24 before January 31, shall transfer the total amount designated 25 on the tax return forms due in the preceding calendar year to 26 the child abuse prevention program early childhood and family 27 services system fund. However, before a checkoff pursuant 28 to this section shall be permitted, all liabilities on the 29 books of the department and accounts identified as owing under 30 section 421.65 shall be satisfied. 31 3. The department of health and human services may authorize 32 payment of moneys from the child abuse prevention program early 33 childhood and family services system fund for the purpose 34 of child abuse prevention in accordance with section 235A.2 35 -31- LSB 5013SV (1) 91 ak/ko 31/ 37 S.F. 2483 234A.6 . 1 4. The department of revenue shall adopt rules to administer 2 this section . 3 5. This section is subject to repeal under section 422.12E . 4 Sec. 45. REPEAL. Sections 235A.1, 235A.2, and 235A.3, Code 5 2026, are repealed. 6 Sec. 46. CHILD ABUSE PREVENTION PROGRAM FUND ââ TRANSFER 7 OF MONEYS. Any unencumbered or unobligated moneys remaining 8 in the child abuse prevention program fund created in section 9 235A.2, on June 30, 2026, shall be transferred to the early 10 childhood and family services system fund created in section 11 234A.6, if created by enactment of 2026 Iowa Acts, House File 12 2712 or Senate File 2462, or successor legislation. If no such 13 fund is enacted, the moneys shall be transferred to the early 14 intervention and supports appropriation in this Act. 15 Sec. 47. CONTINGENT EFFECTIVE DATE. This division of this 16 Act, being deemed of immediate importance, takes effect upon 17 enactment if 2026 Iowa Acts, House File 2712 or Senate File 18 2462, or successor legislation, is enacted. 19 DIVISION XVII 20 COMPREHENSIVE FAMILY SUPPORT PROGRAM 21 Sec. 48. NEW SECTION . 231.80 Comprehensive family support 22 program. 23 1. For the purposes of this section, unless the context 24 otherwise requires: 25 a. âComprehensive family supportâ means services and 26 supports that assist families caring for an individual with 27 a disability who is a member of the family, including but 28 not limited to programs, services, parent-to-parent support, 29 assistive devices, and various adaptations that allow an 30 individual with a disability to participate more fully in 31 family and community life. 32 b. (1) âFamilyâ means a group of interdependent persons 33 living in the same household. A family consists of an 34 individual with a disability and any of the following: 35 -32- LSB 5013SV (1) 91 ak/ko 32/ 37 S.F. 2483 (a) The individualâs parent. 1 (b) The individualâs sibling. 2 (c) The individualâs grandparent, aunt, or uncle. 3 (d) The individualâs legal custodian. 4 (e) A person providing short-term foster care to the 5 individual with a disability subject to a case permanency plan 6 that provides for reunification between the individual and the 7 individualâs parent. 8 (2) âFamilyâ does not include a person who is employed 9 to provide services to an individual with a disability in an 10 out-of-home setting, including but not limited to a hospital, 11 nursing facility, personal care home, board and care home, 12 group foster care home, or other institutional setting. 13 c. âIndividual with a disabilityâ means an individual who is 14 less than twenty-two years of age and meets the definition of 15 developmental disability in 42 U.S.C. Â§15002. 16 d. âServices and supportâ means assistance intended 17 to enable an individual with a disability to control 18 the individualâs environment, to remain living with the 19 individualâs family, to function more independently, and 20 to increase the integration of the individual into the 21 individualâs community including but not limited to funding 22 for purchase of equipment, respite care, supplies, assistive 23 technology, and payment of other costs attributable to 24 the individualâs disability which are identified by the 25 individualâs family. 26 2. A comprehensive family support program is created under 27 the purview of the department to provide a statewide system of 28 services and support to eligible families. The program shall 29 be implemented in a manner that enables a family member of an 30 individual with a disability to identify the needed services 31 and support. 32 3. Eligibility for the program is limited to families who 33 meet all of the following criteria: 34 a. The family resides in the state of Iowa. 35 -33- LSB 5013SV (1) 91 ak/ko 33/ 37 S.F. 2483 b. The family intends for the family member who is an 1 individual with a disability to remain living in the familyâs 2 home. 3 c. The familyâs taxable income is less than sixty thousand 4 dollars for the most recently completed tax year. 5 4. A family may apply to the department or to a family 6 support center for assistance under the comprehensive family 7 support program. The department or family support center shall 8 determine eligibility for the comprehensive family support 9 program in accordance with subsection 3. 10 5. The department shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 11 17A to implement the comprehensive family support program. 12 The comprehensive family support program must do all of the 13 following: 14 a. To the extent possible, incorporate in the application 15 process the eligibility determination processes that the 16 department uses for other disability services programs. 17 b. Ensure the ability of families to maintain control of 18 decisions which affect an individual with a disability who is a 19 member of a family. 20 c. Utilize existing local agencies to provide facilities and 21 a single entry point for program applicants. 22 d. Ensure services and support are provided in a timely 23 manner and emergency access to needed services and support is 24 provided. 25 e. Ensure technical assistance is provided to providers and 26 users of services and support. 27 f. Utilize state, regional, and local media to publicize the 28 program. 29 g. Incorporate a process to appeal the departmentâs or 30 family support centerâs denial of services and support to a 31 family under the program, including reasonable efforts by the 32 department to utilize telecommunications in the appeal process. 33 h. Identify the services and support, and service provider 34 components, included in the program. 35 -34- LSB 5013SV (1) 91 ak/ko 34/ 37 S.F. 2483 i. Upon request by a family member, provide a family with 1 assistance in locating a service provider. 2 j. Make payment for services and support directly to 3 families by voucher or other appropriate means. 4 k. Utilize a voucher system for payment for the family 5 support center component of the program under subsection 7. 6 6. Services and support provided under the comprehensive 7 family support program shall not be used to supplant other 8 services and support available to a family of an individual 9 with a disability but shall be used to meet family needs that 10 will not be met without the program. 11 7. The comprehensive family support program shall include a 12 family support center component. Under the component, a family 13 member of an individual with a disability shall be assisted 14 by a family support center in identifying the services and 15 support to be provided to the family under the family support 16 subsidy program or the comprehensive family support program. 17 The identification of services and support must be based upon 18 the specific needs of the individual with a disability and 19 the individualâs family which are not met by other service 20 programs available to the individual with a disability and the 21 individualâs family. 22 8. The comprehensive family support program shall be funded 23 by appropriations made by the general assembly for purposes of 24 the program. Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys appropriated 25 for the comprehensive family support program under this section 26 that remain unobligated or unexpended at the close of each 27 fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain available for 28 expenditure for the purposes designated until the close of the 29 immediately succeeding fiscal year. 30 Sec. 49. CODE EDITOR DIRECTIVE. The Code editor is directed 31 to designate section 231.80, as enacted in this division 32 of this Act, as subchapter VIII of chapter 231 entitled 33 âComprehensive Family Support Programâ. 34 Sec. 50. EFFECTIVE DATE. This division of this Act, being 35 -35- LSB 5013SV (1) 91 ak/ko 35/ 37 S.F. 2483 deemed of immediate importance, takes effect upon enactment. 1 Sec. 51. RETROACTIVE APPLICABILITY. This division of this 2 Act applies retroactively to July 1, 2025. 3 DIVISION XVIII 4 CHILD CARE ASSISTANCE AND ADOPTION SUBSIDY EXPENDITURE 5 PROJECTIONS 6 Sec. 52. REPEAL. Section 234.47, Code 2026, is repealed. 7